src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_nouns.lexc
+NI+Poss+Pret+Sg+3SgProxPoss:imiban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Sg+3PlObvPoss:iminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Sg+3PlProxPoss:imiwaa EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Sg+3SgObvPoss:iminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Sg+3SgProxPoss:im EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3PlObvPoss:iniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:iwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:iwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3SgObvPoss:iniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:ibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:ibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg+3PlObvPoss:iniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg+3PlProxPoss:iwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg+3SgObvPoss:iniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg+3SgProxPoss:iban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg+3PlObvPoss:iniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg+3PlProxPoss:iwaa EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg+3SgObvPoss:iniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg+3SgProxPoss: EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg+3SgProxPoss:i2w1 EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_Cw                                           !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary
0:%>%> NI_Class=NI_Cw_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_Cw                                           !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_Cw_Flags
@R.Prefix.GI@ NI_Class=NI_Cw_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ NI_Class=NI_Cw_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ NI_Class=NI_Cw_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;
@R.Prefix.O@ NI_Class=NI_Cw_Flags_Prefix=O ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_Cw                                           !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_Cw_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ NI_Class=NI_Cw_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_Cw, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other               !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_Cw_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+NI+Dim+Loc:oonsing EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+LocDist:oonsikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc:oonzhishing EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+LocDist:oonzhishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl:oonzhishan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+Sg:oonzhish EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pl:oonsan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Loc:oonsibaning EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+LocDist:oonsibanikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl:oonsibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl:oonsibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Sg:oonsiban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Sg:oons EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Loc:ong EncliticRoot ;
+NI+LocDist:okaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Loc:oshing EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+LocDist:oshikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Pl:oshan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Sg:osh EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pl:oon EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Loc:obaning EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+LocDist:obanikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl:obanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl:obaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg:oban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg: EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_Cw                                           !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NI                                          !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_Cw_Flags_Prefix=NI
@U.Order.Other@ NI_Class=NI_Cw_Prefix=NI_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_Cw, Prefix: NI, Order: Other                 !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Stems
aagwaayaa'aandaagosag:aagwaayaa'aandaagosagw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
aamoo-ziinzibaakwad:aamoo-ziinzibaakwadw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
aasaakamig:aasaakamigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
aazhawaatebii'iganaabik:aazhawaatebii'iganaabikw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
abanzhiiyaak:abanzhiiyaakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
abwaajiganaatig:abwaajiganaatigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
abwewinaabik:abwewinaabikw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
aditebag:aditebagw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
adoopowiniigin:adoopowiniiginw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
agoodakikwaanaabik:agoodakikwaanaabikw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
agoojiganaatig:agoojiganaatigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
agwaayaa'anaakonisag:agwaayaa'anaakonisagw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
akakanzhewaatig:akakanzhewaatigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
akwa'wewigamig:akwa'wewigamigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
andoojii'iganaak:andoojii'iganaakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
animoshkiinzhig:animoshkiinzhigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
anishinaabe-ziinzibaakwad:anishinaabe-ziinzibaakwadw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
apa'iganaak:apa'iganaakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
apikweshimoniigin:apikweshimoniiginw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
asaawensiwegin:asaawensiweginw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
asabaabik:asabaabikw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
asanjigoowigamig:asanjigoowigamigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
ashaweshk:ashaweshkw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
ashkiigin:ashkiiginw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
awakaanigamig:awakaanigamigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
awaswaanaabik:awaswaanaabikw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
azaadiibag:azaadiibagw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
azhebowaanaak:azhebowaanaakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
baaga'adowaanaatig:baaga'adowaanaatigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
baaka'iganaak:baaka'iganaakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
baashkiziganaabik:baashkiziganaabikw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
baate-mitig:baate-mitigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
babagiwaanegamig:babagiwaanegamigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
babagiwayaaniigin:babagiwayaaniiginw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
badakijii'iganaak:badakijii'iganaakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
bagiwaanegin:bagiwaaneginw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
bagizoowigamig:bagizoowigamigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
bakite'iganaak:bakite'iganaakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
bakitejii'igewi-bikwaakwad:bakitejii'igewi-bikwaakwadw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
bakwezhiganike-adaawewigamig:bakwezhiganike-adaawewigamigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
bapasijii'iganaak:bapasijii'iganaakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
bawa'iganaak:bawa'iganaakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
bigishkani-adaawewigamig:bigishkani-adaawewigamigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
biimaatig:biimaatigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
biiswewegin:biisweweginw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
bikonjiwaabik:bikonjiwaabikw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
bimiwanaatig:bimiwanaatigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
bizindamoo-makak:bizindamoo-makakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
daashkiga'isewaatig:daashkiga'isewaatigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
dibaakonigewigamig:dibaakonigewigamigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
eshkanaatig:eshkanaatigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
gaasiibii'iganaak:gaasiibii'iganaakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
gashkigwaasoowigamig:gashkigwaasoowigamigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
gibaakwa'odiiwigamig:gibaakwa'odiiwigamigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
gichi-adaawewigamig:gichi-adaawewigamigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
gichi-miijim-adaawewigamig:gichi-miijim-adaawewigamigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
giigidoo-biiwaabikoonsi-mitig:giigidoo-biiwaabikoonsi-mitigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
giisizekwaanaabik:giisizekwaanaabikw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
giizizekwaanaabik:giizizekwaanaabikw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
ginebigobag:ginebigobagw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
gizhibaayaabiigiwebishkigani-gashkigwaasonaabik:gizhibaayaabiigiwebishkigani-gashkigwaasonaabikw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
giziibiigidaabaanewigamig:giziibiigidaabaanewigamigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
gwekaakoweba'iganaak:gwekaakoweba'iganaakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
iskigamiziganaak:iskigamiziganaakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
jiibegamig:jiibegamigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
jiishaakwa'iganaatig:jiishaakwa'iganaatigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
maazhimaagwegin:maazhimaagweginw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
makadewegin:makadeweginw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
makosag:makosagw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
manoominaatig:manoominaatigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
mashkiigwakamig:mashkiigwakamigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
mazina'igani-makakosag:mazina'igani-makakosagw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
mazinaatesewigamig:mazinaatesewigamigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
midewigaanaak:midewigaanaakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
mikawamii-makak:mikawamii-makakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
mishi-makakosag:mishi-makakosagw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
miskwegin:miskweginw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
mookomaanaabik:mookomaanaabikw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
na'aakinzhe'iganaak:na'aakinzhe'iganaakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
naawinde'iganaak:naawinde'iganaakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
nagamoshkwemag:nagamoshkwemagw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
nemaabiiwigamig:nemaabiiwigamigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
nibinaadwaaganaatig:nibinaadwaaganaatigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
ningaasimoowegin:ningaasimooweginw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
odaabaani-waabandizonaabik:odaabaani-waabandizonaabikw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
ode'ibag:ode'ibagw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
okaadaak:okaadaakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
omba'iganaak:omba'iganaakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
ozaawi-ziinzibaakwad:ozaawi-ziinzibaakwadw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
ozhobii'iganaak:ozhobii'iganaakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
waabigwanii-adaawewigamig:waabigwanii-adaawewigamigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
waaboozwegin:waaboozweginw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
waasechiganaabik:waasechiganaabikw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
waasikwegin:waasikweginw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
waazakonenjiganaatig:waazakonenjiganaatigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
wazhiwashk:wazhiwashkw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
wiigwaasi-makak:wiigwaasi-makakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
wiingashk:wiingashkw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
wiiyaas-adaawewigamig:wiiyaas-adaawewigamigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
zenibaawegin:zenibaaweginw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
zhiishiibaawan:zhiishiibaawanw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
zhingibinataanaak:zhingibinataanaakw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
zhooniyaawaabik:zhooniyaawaabikw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
zhooshkwega'iganaatig:zhooshkwega'iganaatigw2 NI_Class=NI_Cw_Boundary ;
